District of Columbia statutes.
1-135

Application of Campaign Finance Reform and Conflict of Interest Act.

All provisions of the District of Columbia Campaign Finance Reform and Conflict of Interest Act, subchapter III of Chapter 11A of this title, which apply to the election of and service of the Mayor of the District of Columbia shall apply to persons who are candidates or elected to serve as United States Senators and United States Representative pursuant to this initiative.

History

Aug. 14, 1982, D.C. Law 4-138, § 3, 29 DCR 2761
Apr. 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 501(m), 59 DCR 1862

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-131.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-119.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 19-124 substituted “subchapter III of Chapter 11A of this title” for “subchapter I of Chapter 11 of this title”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 401(m) of Board of Ethics and Government Accountability Establishment and Comprehensive Ethics Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-298, January 29, 2012, 59 DCR 683).

Expiration of Law

Expiration of Law 4-138

Section 4 of D.C. Law 4-138 provided that the provisions of § 1-119 (§ 1-135, 2001 Ed.) shall expire 30 days after the date that the provisions of the Federal Election Campaign Act of 1971 ( 2 U.S.C. § 431 et seq.) are determined by appropriate federal authorities to apply to the Senators and Representative from the District of Columbia.